src/phonology/eng-phon.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The English morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

! Triggers
%^C2CC:0 	 !!= * @CODE@ used with adjectives and verbs to double consonant
%^Y2I:0		 !!= * @CODE@ y:i in adjectives and nouns

 %>:0 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;
 
Rules

"Vowel change y:i"
 y:i <=>
  _ %^Y2I: ;
!! city+N+Pl
!!€ city%^Y2I%>es
!!€ citi0%>es

"Double consonant"
 0:Cx <=>
 Cx _ %^C2CC: ;
 where Cx in (b d f g l m n p r t B D F G L M N P R T) ; 

!! big+A+Comp
!!€ big0%^C2CC%>er
!!€ bigg0%>er

"Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
 s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ ;

!!€ primus%>s
!!€ primus00

!!€grís%>s
!!€grís00

!!$grís%>s
!!$grís0s
